Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.100

Commissioners—Vacancies.

Vacancies on the board of park and recreation commissioners shall occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

[ 1994 c 223 s 46; 1963 c 4 s 36.69.100. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 10.]